Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.310

Department of health—Powers and duties.

The department shall:

(1) Establish reasonable license and examination fees and fees for services to other agencies in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. In cases where there are unanticipated demands for services, the department may request payment for services directly from the agencies for whom the services are performed, to the extent that revenues or other funds are available. Drug-related investigations regarding licensed health care practitioners shall be funded by an appropriation to the department from the health professions account. The payment may be made on either an advance or a reimbursable basis as approved by the director of financial management;

(2) Employ, with confirmation by the commission, an executive officer, who shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW and who shall employ inspectors, investigators, chemists, and other persons as necessary to assist it for any purpose which it may deem necessary;

(3) Investigate and prosecute, at the direction of the commission, including use of subpoena powers, violations of law or regulations under its jurisdiction or the jurisdiction of the commission;

(4) Make, at the direction of the commission, inspections and investigations of pharmacies and other places, including dispensing machines, in which drugs or devices are stored, held, compounded, dispensed, sold, or administered to the ultimate consumer, to take and analyze any drugs or devices and to seize and condemn any drugs or devices which are adulterated, misbranded, stored, held, dispensed, distributed, administered, or compounded in violation of or contrary to law. The written operating agreement between the department and the commission, as required by RCW 43.70.240 shall include provisions for the department to involve the commission in carrying out its duties required by this section.

[ 2022 c 240 s 16; 2013 c 19 s 21; 1996 c 191 s 49; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.